Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8232.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph 1 of Section 8 of Chapter 109 of the 1958 Public Laws entitled
"An Act Authorizing the Formation of a Regional School District Embracing the Towns of Foster
and Gloucester" is hereby amended to read as follows:
The regional school district financial meeting shall be held on March 24, 1998 March 24,
2026 at 8:00p.m. 7:00 p.m. at the regional school building, or other such location as the regional
school committee may publicly designate in advance. Beginning in 1999 2027, the regional school
district financial town meeting will be held on the third Tuesday in March each year. Special
meetings may be called by vote of the regional district school on accordance with conditions
governing town meetings generally prescribed by state law. All voters qualified at the financial
town meeting next preceeding preceding such regional school district financial meeting and the
respective towns of Foster and Glocester shall be eligible to attend and vote at the regional district
school financial meeting.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005988
========